Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB584.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 64LEAD ABATEMENT ASSISTANCESec.6401. Scope of chapter.6402. Definitions.6403. Lead Abatement Grant Program . 6404. Lead Abatement Assistance Fund . 6405. Imposition of surcharge.6406. Guidelines.123456789101112131415161718 § 6401. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to l ead abatement assistance. § 6402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Architectural paint." Interior and exterior architectural coatings used for commercial or homeowner use. The term does not include aerosol spray paint or coatings purchased for industrial or original equipment manufacturer use."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Lead Abatement Assistance Fund established in section 6404 (relating to Lead Abatement Assistance Fund ). "Lead abatement." A set of measures designed to permanently eliminate lead-based paint hazards in accordance with standards established by the department, provided that the standards are consistent with applicable Federal standards. The term includes:(1) The removal of lead-based paint and lead-contaminated dust, the permanent containment or encapsulation of lead-based paint, the replacement of lead-painted surfaces or fixtures and the removal or covering of lead-contaminated soil.(2) All preparation, cleanup, disposal and postabatement clearance testing activities associated with such measures."Lead hazard control work." Work to make housing lead-safe or to mitigate through the use of interim controls as permitted under Federal law and as defined as Federally supported work in 42 U.S.C. § 4851b (relating to definitions), or to eliminate permanently lead-based paint hazards on a premises by a person 20250HB0584PN0592 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified to perform lead abatement work under the act of July 6, 1995 (P.L.291, No.44), known as the Lead Certification Act."Operator." A person in control of or having responsibility for the daily operation of a store which may include the owner of a store.§ 6403. Lead Abatement Grant Program . (a) Establishment.--(1) The department, in consultation with the Department of Health and the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall establish a program that issues grants to municipalities.(2) Grants must be used to provide assistance to owners of single-family homes and owners of rental housing, whether or not utilized as rental housing, for lead hazard control work.(3) Grants shall be provided for a period to be determined by the department.(b) Eligibility.--To receive a grant under this section, a municipality must demonstrate that the municipality has an existing or planned lead abatement assistance program that satisfies the conditions of subsection (a).(c) Competitive awards.--The department shall issue grants under this section to municipalities on a competitive basis according to the following criteria:(1) Whether the municipality demonstrates a financial need for the grant.(2) The overall age of the housing stock located within the municipality.(3) The number of households in proportion to the total population, with household incomes less than 50% of the 20250HB0584PN0592 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 median area income.(4) Whether the municipality gives priority consideration to households with household incomes less than 50% of the median area income.(5) Whether the municipality gives priority consideration to residences in which children under six years of age reside.(6) The department shall take into consideration geographical distribution of funds awarded to municipalities to ensure that all areas of this Commonwealth participate to the greatest extent possible.§ 6404. Lead Abatement Assistance Fund . (a) Establishment.--The Lead Abatement Assistance Fund is established within the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes specified in this chapter.(b) Deposit.--Money collected from the surcharge established under section 6405 (relating to imposition of surcharge) shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Use of money.--(1) The fund shall be used by the department exclusively for the purpose of issuing grants provided for under section 6403 (relating to Lead Abatement Grant Program ). (2) The department may utilize up to 10% of the total money collected and deposited into the fund within a fiscal year to cover the costs associated with administering this chapter.§ 6405. Imposition of surcharge. (a) Establishment of surcharge.--A surcharge of 50 ¢ shall be imposed on each gallon of architectural paint sold by an 20250HB0584PN0592 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operator to a consumer.(b) Collection.--The operator shall collect the surcharge and remit the money to the Commonwealth on a quarterly basis.§ 6406. Guidelines.Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall establish rules and guidelines to carry out the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0584PN0592 - 5 - 12345678